Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2425
Cancer drug donation.

Any person or entity, including, but not limited to, a cancer drug manufacturer or health care facility, may donate cancer drugs to the program. Cancer drugs may be donated to a participant.

Laws 2003, LB 756, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 331, § 3.